Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 44
HAZARDOUS WASTE MANAGEMENT

Sec.

§ 39-4401. Short title.

This act may be known and cited as the “Hazardous Waste Management Act of 1983.”

§ 39-4402. Legislative findings and purposes.

The legislature of the State of Idaho finds:

That continuing technological progress, increases in manufacturing, and the abatement of air and water pollution have resulted in ever-increasing quantities of hazardous waste;

That the public health and safety, and the environment, are threatened when hazardous wastes are not managed in an environmentally sound manner;

That the knowledge and technology necessary for alleviating adverse health, environmental and aesthetic impacts resulting from current hazardous waste management and disposal practices are generally available; and,

That the problem of proper management of hazardous waste has become a matter of great statewide concern.

Therefore, it is hereby declared that the purposes of this act are:

To protect the public health and safety, the health of living organisms, and the environment from the effects of the improper, inadequate, or unsound management of hazardous waste;

To establish a program to track and control hazardous wastes from the time they are generated through transportation, treatment, storage, and disposal; and,

To assure the safe and adequate management of hazardous wastes within this state.

§ 39-4403. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Board” means the Idaho board of environmental quality.

“Commercial hazardous waste facility or site” means any hazardous waste facility whose primary business is the treatment, storage or disposal, for a fee or other consideration, of hazardous waste generated offsite by generators other than the owner and operator of the facility.

“Department” means the Idaho department of environmental quality.

“Director” means the director of the Idaho department of environmental quality or the director’s authorized agent.

“Disposal” means the discharge, deposit, injection, dumping, spilling, leaking or placing of any hazardous waste into or on any land or water so that such hazardous waste or any constituent thereof may enter the environment or be emitted into the air or discharged into any waters, including ground waters.

“Gate ton” means the weight, in tons (2,000 pounds/ton), of waste material received at a facility. This weight does not include any subsequent changes to the weight resulting from the management of the waste by the facility.

“Generator” means any person, who by virtue of ownership, management, or control, is responsible for causing or allowing to be caused the creation of a hazardous waste.

“Hazardous waste” means a waste or combination of wastes of a solid, liquid, semisolid, or contained gaseous form which, because of its quantity, concentration or characteristics (physical, chemical or biological) may:

Cause or significantly contribute to an increase in deaths or an increase in serious, irreversible or incapacitating reversible illnesses; or

Pose a substantial threat to human health or to the environment if improperly treated, stored, disposed of, or managed. Such wastes include, but are not limited to, materials which are toxic, corrosive, ignitible, or reactive, or materials which may have mutagenic, teratogenic, or carcinogenic properties but do not include solid or dissolved material in domestic sewage, or solid or dissolved materials in irrigation return flows or industrial discharges which are point sources subject to national pollution discharge elimination system permits under the federal water pollution control act, as amended, 33 U.S.C., section 1251 et seq., or source, special nuclear, or byproduct material as defined by the atomic energy act of 1954, as amended, 42 U.S.C., section 2011 et seq.

“Hazardous waste management” means the systematic control of the collection, source separation, storage, treatment, transportation, processing, and disposal of hazardous wastes.

“Hazardous waste facility or site” means any property, structure, or ancillary equipment intended or used for the transportation, treatment, storage or disposal of hazardous wastes.

“Injection” means the subsurface emplacement of free liquids.

“Manifest” means a form used for identifying the quantity, composition, origin, routing, waste identification code(s), and destination of hazardous waste during any transportation from the point of generation to the point of treatment, storage or disposal.

“Manifested waste” means waste which at the point of origin or generation is required to be manifested for transportation in a manner similar to that of the federal uniform hazardous waste manifest or by other manifest requirements designed to assure proper treatment, storage and disposal of such waste.
(14) “PCB waste” means any waste or waste item which is not included in the definition of “hazardous waste” and which is contaminated with polychlorinated biphenyls.

(15) “Person” means any individual, association, partnership, firm, joint stock company, trust, estate, political subdivision, public or private corporation, state or federal governmental department, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal entity which is recognized by law as the subject of rights and duties.

(16) “RCRA” means the resource conservation and recovery act of 1976 as amended from time to time.

(17) “Restricted hazardous waste” means a waste or combination of wastes regulated as land disposal restricted pursuant to federal statutes and regulations, including 40 CFR part 268. Restricted hazardous waste also includes byproduct, source, special nuclear materials or devices or equipment, except as provided below, utilizing such materials regulated under the federal atomic energy act of 1954, as amended. Restricted hazardous waste shall not include radiologically contaminated waste materials from “Formerly Utilized Sites Remedial Action Program (FUSRAP)” sites administered by the United States army corps of engineers or materials that have been exempted or released from radiological control or regulation under the atomic energy act of 1954, as amended, to be disposed of in a commercial hazardous waste facility as regulated pursuant to the rules, permit requirements and acceptance criteria provided for by this chapter.

(18) “Storage” means the containment of hazardous wastes, on a temporary basis or for a period of years, in such a manner as not to constitute disposal of such hazardous wastes.

(19) “Transportation” means the movement of any hazardous waste to or from a hazardous waste facility or site.

(20) “Transporter” means any person who transports a hazardous waste to or from a hazardous waste facility or site.

(21) “Treatment” means any method, technique, or process, including neutralization, which is designed not to be an integral part of a production process, but which is rather designed to change the physical, chemical, or biological character or composition of any hazardous waste prior to storage or final disposal so as to neutralize such waste or so as to render such waste nonhazardous or less hazardous; safer to transport, store, or dispose of; or amenable for recovery, amenable for storage or reduced in volume. Such term includes any activity or processing designed to change the physical form or chemical composition of hazardous waste so as to render it nonhazardous.

(22) “Waste” means any solid, semisolid, liquid or contained gaseous material for which no reasonable use or reuse is intended or which is intended to be discarded.

§ 39-4404. Consistency with federal law.

The legislature intends that the state of Idaho enact and carry out a hazardous waste program that will enable the state to assume primacy over hazardous waste control from the federal government.

The legislature finds that the RCRA, as amended, 42 U.S.C., section 6901 et seq., and federal regulations adopted pursuant thereto, establish complex and detailed provisions for regulation of those who generate, transport, treat, store, and dispose of hazardous wastes. The legislature cannot conveniently or advantageously set forth in this chapter all the requirements of all of the regulations which have been or will be established under RCRA. However, by the provisions of this chapter, the legislature desires to avoid the existence of duplicative, overlapping or conflicting state and federal regulatory systems.

Therefore, the board is directed to promulgate rules which are consistent with RCRA and the federal regulations adopted by the administrator of the United States environmental protection agency to implement RCRA. Farmers and ranchers who treat, store, or dispose of waste pesticides from their operations on lands owned or controlled by them shall not be required by board rules to do anything more than follow the instructions on the pesticide label and triple rinse empty containers in accordance with the RCRA regulations of the environmental protection agency. The board may not promulgate any rule that would impose conditions or requirements more stringent or broader in scope than RCRA and the RCRA regulations of the environmental protection agency. The board may, however, promulgate procedural rules and rules specifically authorized by this chapter or other state statutes without showing that those rules are required by RCRA or the regulations of the environmental protection agency; provided that those rules shall not conflict with this section, other sections of this chapter, RCRA, or the regulations of the environmental protection agency. Any rule promulgated by the board shall be valid until it is repealed or modified through the administrative process of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

§ 39-4405. Rules in general.

Pursuant to the procedures established by the Idaho administrative procedure act, chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, the board shall adopt such rules as are necessary and feasible for the management of the generation, collection, transportation, treatment, storage, and disposal of hazardous wastes within the state. The board shall also adopt such rules as necessary to regulate persons who produce, burn, distribute, and market fuel containing hazardous waste. The rules promulgated by the board shall be a part of this code and shall have the force and effect of law. Such rules shall include, but not be limited to:

Criteria for the determination of whether any waste or combination of wastes is hazardous for the purposes of this chapter;

Rules for those who generate, transport, treat, store, or dispose of hazardous wastes;

Rules, consistent with those issued by the United States environmental protection agency and the United States department of transportation, for containerization, labeling and manifesting of hazardous wastes;

Rules specifying the terms and conditions under which the department shall issue, modify, suspend, revoke, or deny such permits as shall be required by this chapter;

Lists of those wastes or combinations of wastes which are not compatible and which may not be stored or disposed of together;

Procedures and requirements for the reporting of the generation, transportation, treatment, storage or disposal of hazardous wastes;

Rules establishing standards and procedures for the training of personnel at generation sites and at hazardous waste facilities and sites;

Release detection, prevention and correction rules applicable to all owners and operators of underground storage tanks, as may be necessary to protect human health and the environment;

Rules specifying radioactive materials or other radioactive materials occurring naturally that may be disposed of at a commercial hazardous waste facility or site.

§ 39-4406. General powers and duties of director.

The director:

Shall take all actions not inconsistent with this chapter as are necessary and feasible to enable the department to assume and continue primacy over hazardous waste management, pursuant to RCRA;

May conduct and publish studies of hazardous waste management in this state;

Shall develop, publish, and revise as necessary a plan for the safe and effective management of hazardous wastes within this state. Such a plan may identify those locations in the state which are not suitable for the establishment of hazardous waste treatment or disposal facilities or sites;

Shall exercise all powers and discharge all duties expressed in or implied from the other sections of this chapter.

§ 39-4407. Identification of hazardous wastes.

The board shall establish criteria for determining if any waste or combination of wastes is hazardous or nonhazardous, for the purposes of this chapter.

The board may adopt, and amend from time to time a list or lists of hazardous wastes. The board may, with public notice but without the necessity of a public hearing, list as hazardous any waste or combination of wastes determined to be hazardous by the United States environmental protection agency. To accomplish this goal, the board may adopt by reference the regulations containing the lists of hazardous wastes and the set of characteristics for identifying hazardous wastes promulgated by the United States environmental protection agency pursuant to RCRA. The board shall update the regulations adopted pursuant to this section as needed to reflect regulatory amendments promulgated by the United States environmental protection agency. The board may adopt regulations for a state hazardous waste delisting program equivalent to that set forth in 40 CFR sections 260.20(b) and 260.22. The state delisting program shall provide for public notice and opportunity for comment before granting or denying delisting requests.

§ 39-4408. Unauthorized treatment, storage, release, use or disposal of hazardous waste prohibited.

No person shall treat or store hazardous waste, nor shall any person discharge, incinerate, release, spill, place, or dispose any hazardous waste in such a manner that the waste, or any constituent thereof, may enter the environment, unless the department has issued said person a permit or a variance as required for the specific activity involved or exempted the activity from permit requirements.

Effective six (6) months after the effective date of this provision, nonhazardous liquids shall not be disposed of in a landfill for which a permit is required under section 39-4409, Idaho Code, or which is operating pursuant to interim status granted under section 3005(c) of RCRA, unless the owner or operator of the landfill demonstrates to the director that:

The only reasonable alternative is placement in a landfill or unlined surface impoundment which contains or may contain hazardous waste; and

Placement in the owner or operator’s landfill will not present a risk of contamination of any existing or potential underground source of drinking water.

Waste or used oil or other material which is contaminated or mixed with any hazardous waste, other than wastes identified solely on the basis of ignitibility, shall not be used for dust suppression or road treatment.

The board shall have authority to prohibit:

Land disposal of any hazardous waste; and

Storage of any hazardous waste prohibited from land disposal, unless such storage is solely for the purpose of the accumulation of such quantities of hazardous waste as are necessary to facilitate proper recovery, treatment or disposal.

§ 39-4409. Permit requirements for hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal facilities.

No person shall construct, operate, or modify a hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal facility or site without a permit from the department. The owner or operator of the facility or site rather than the builder shall be responsible for obtaining the permit. Permits may contain such conditions necessary to protect human health and environment. The board may exempt classes or categories of hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal facilities from the permit requirement if the exemption is in the public interest and consistent with RCRA requirements. The fact that a class or category of such facilities is not required to obtain a federal permit shall be persuasive evidence that an exemption is in the public interest.

Interim status granted by RCRA or a permit issued by the United States environmental protection agency prior to the date that the state program is authorized by the administrator of that agency shall be adopted by the department as a state granted interim status or as a state granted permit until the department issues a new state permit. The board may adopt such rules and regulations as necessary to:

Allow other facilities to qualify for interim status;

Require existing interim status surface impoundments, new units, replacement of existing units and lateral expansions of existing interim status facilities to comply with all regulations which apply to new facilities; and

Provide for the termination of interim status.

The board shall promulgate rules and regulations establishing the terms and conditions for issuing permits to the described facilities and sites. The rules and regulations shall provide for, but not be limited to:

Standards and procedures for the safe operation and maintenance of the facilities and sites;

Education and training qualifications of personnel at the facilities and sites;

Contractual commitment or consent to each facility or site from all holders of interests in the real property committed to that facility or site;

Monetary assurances in such form and amount as are necessary for effective management, maintenance, and monitoring of the facilities and sites during and after operation;

Evidence of financial responsibility for corrective action on-site and off-site;

Liability insurance in such form and amount as is necessary to compensate for potential damages caused by the facilities and sites; provided, that liability insurance shall not be required in the event that liability insurance is not required by the federal regulations adopted pursuant to the RCRA;

Emergency equipment and emergency response plans appropriate to the facilities and sites;

Public participation in the permitting process consistent with 42 U.S.C. section 6974(b).
(4) Permits shall be issued for a period not to exceed ten (10) years or the maximum period allowed under RCRA, whichever is greater. However, permits may be reviewed at least every five (5) years and modified as necessary to take into account changes in this chapter or regulations promulgated pursuant to it and improvements in technology. Permits issued to hazardous waste facilities and sites by the department prior to the effective date of this chapter shall be reissued to conform with the provisions of this chapter and the rules and regulations promulgated under this chapter.

Provide for the construction of such facilities, as necessary, and for operation of the facility for not longer than one (1) year (unless renewed as provided below); and

Provide for the receipt and treatment by the facility of only those types and quantities of hazardous waste which the director deems necessary for purposes of determining the efficiency and performance capabilities of the technology or process and the effects of such technology or process on human health and the environment; and

Include such requirements as the director deems necessary to protect human health and the environment (including, but not limited to, requirements regarding monitoring, operation, insurance or bonding, financial responsibility, closure, and remedial action); and

Include such requirements as the director deems necessary regarding testing and providing of information to the director with respect to the operation of the facility.

(5) Any permit issued after the effective date of this provision shall require corrective action to be taken on-site and off-site for all releases of hazardous waste or constituents, from any solid waste management unit at the treatment, storage, or disposal facility seeking the permit, regardless of the time when the waste was placed in such unit. Permits issued from November 8, 1985, until the effective date of this provision shall be reissued to conform with this provision.

(6) Any permit issued under this section may be revoked by the director pursuant to the provisions of section 39-4413, Idaho Code, if the permitted party fails to comply with the terms and conditions of the permit, this chapter, or the rules and regulations promulgated under this chapter.

(7) The department may issue a variance from the requirements of the rules and regulations promulgated under this section, if, in the judgment of the director, application of the requirements would cause unreasonable hardship and the granting of a variance would not be harmful to the public interest or inconsistent with RCRA requirements. A variance shall not exceed one (1) year in duration and may be renewed or extended only after the department provides public notice and an opportunity for public comment.

(8)(a) The director of the department may issue a research, development and demonstration permit for any hazardous waste treatment technology or process for which permit standards for such experimental activity have not been promulgated. Any such permit shall include such terms and conditions as will assure protection of human health and the environment. Such permits shall:

(b) The director may apply the criteria set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection in establishing the conditions of each permit without separate establishment of regulations implementing such criteria.

(c) For the purpose of expediting review and issuance of permits under this subsection, the director may, consistent with the protection of human health and the environment, modify or waive permit application and permit issuance requirements established in the general permit regulations except that there may be no modification or waiver of regulations regarding financial responsibility (including insurance) or of applicable public participation procedures.
(d) The director may renew a research, development and demonstration permit which has been issued pursuant to this subsection. The renewal term shall be no longer than one (1) year. A permit shall not be renewed more than three (3) times.

§ 39-4410. Transportation of hazardous waste.

The board shall promulgate hazardous waste transportation rules and regulations to control the intrastate and interstate transportation of federally regulated types and quantities of hazardous waste. The rules and regulations shall be consistent with the rules and regulations issued by the United States department of transportation and the United States environmental protection agency. The rules and regulations shall also be consistent with the rules and regulations of the Idaho public utilities commission unless such consistency would impair the primacy or the effectiveness of the state’s hazardous waste management program. In that case the board shall confer with the commission and endeavor to develop mutually acceptable transportation rules and regulations. If mutually acceptable rules and regulations cannot be developed, the board shall promulgate transportation rules and regulations that minimize conflict with the commission’s rules and regulations while assuring the primary authority and effectiveness of the state’s hazardous waste management program. Rules and regulations so promulgated by the board shall prevail over conflicting rules and regulations of the commission.

The hazardous waste transportation rules and regulations shall apply to all transporters of federally regulated types and quantities of hazardous waste generated either by themselves or by others. These rules and regulations shall apply to any movement of a regulated quantity of hazardous wastes to or from a hazardous waste facility or site.

The hazardous waste transportation rules and regulations shall provide for but not be limited to:

Standards for the containerization and labeling of hazardous wastes;

Standards for the handling and placarding of hazardous waste shipments;

A hazardous waste tracking system requiring that:

All transporters of federally regulated types and quantities of hazardous waste obtain an identification number from the department, the environmental protection agency, or another approved state program, before accepting hazardous waste for transport;

All shipments of federally regulated types and quantities of hazardous waste to be shipped off site or received from off site be accompanied by a manifest or similar form describing the hazardous waste being shipped and its destination;

A copy of each manifest or similar form be returned to the generator and/or originator of the shipment and a copy be retained by the transporter for a minimum of three (3) years.

The hazardous waste transportation rules and regulations may provide for special routing of hazardous waste shipments in this state when necessary to protect the public health, the public safety, or the environment consistent with federal statutory, regulatory and constitutional requirements.

§ 39-4411. Records — Reporting — Monitoring.

Pursuant to the provisions of section 39-4405, Idaho Code, the board shall adopt, and amend as necessary, such rules relating to records, reporting, and monitoring as may be needed to achieve the purposes of this chapter. These rules may include, but shall not be limited to, prescribing procedures and requirements for:

The establishment, maintenance, and format of records and reports;

The submittal of records and reports;

The taking of samples and the performing of tests and of analyses;

The use of approved monitoring methods and techniques;

The installation, calibration, use, and maintenance of monitoring equipment; and

The provision of relevant information to the department.

Sixty (60) days after promulgation of the criteria and lists specified under section 39-4407, Idaho Code, and the rules required under section 39-4405, Idaho Code, and subsection (1) of this section, the generation, transportation, treatment, storage, or disposal of a hazardous waste in this state by any person without reporting such activity to the department as required by the rules issued pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be unlawful.

Information obtained by the department or by agents, contractors, or other representatives of the department, under any provisions of this chapter, shall be subject to disclosure according to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code.

Effective January 1, 1996, each generator shall, at the discretion of the director, no later than thirty (30) days after the end of each calendar year submit a written annual report to the department including the following information:

The types and quantities of hazardous wastes generated;

The types and quantities of such wastes shipped for treatment and disposal by landfilling or other means of disposal;

The types and quantities of such wastes remaining in storage at the end of the reporting period;

Whether such wastes are destined for disposal or treatment in this state or whether such wastes are destined for disposal or treatment outside this state.

Effective January 1, 1996, the operator of each commercial hazardous waste disposal facility or site in the state shall, no later than thirty (30) days after the end of each calendar year, submit a written annual report to the department providing information on the types and quantities of wastes received which were generated in Idaho, and information on the types and quantities of wastes received which were generated in other states.

Prior to March 1 of each year the department shall submit a report to the governor and the legislature detailing the types and quantities of hazardous wastes generated in this state, the types and quantities of such wastes shipped for treatment and disposal by landfilling or other means of disposal, the types and quantities of such wastes remaining in storage at the end of the most recent reporting period and the types and quantities of hazardous waste generated outside this state and shipped into this state for storage or disposal.

§ 39-4412. Inspections — Right of entry.

All inspections and searches conducted under the authority of this chapter shall be performed in conformity with the prohibitions against unreasonable searches and seizures contained in the fourth amendment to the constitution of the United States and article I, section 17, of the constitution of the state of Idaho. The state shall not, under the authority granted by this chapter, conduct warrantless administrative searches of private property in the absence of either consent from the property owner or occupier or exigent circumstances such as a public health or environmental emergency.

For the purposes of developing or enforcing any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation authorized by this chapter, any duly authorized state employee or representative may, upon presentation of appropriate credentials, at any reasonable time:

Enter upon any private or public property where hazardous wastes are or have been generated, transported, treated, stored, or disposed of to inspect and to secure samples of such wastes, their containers, and their labels;

Enter into any aircraft, vehicle, vessel, rail car, trailer, van, or other means of conveyance where hazardous wastes are or have been contained to inspect and to secure samples of such wastes, their containers, and their labels;

Enter any private or public property, or means of conveyance, where records, reports, information or test results relating to the generation, transportation, treatment, storage, or disposal of hazardous wastes exist to inspect and copy such documents.

Upon request by an authorized agent of a property owner or facility operator, the department shall provide the property owner or facility operator with a receipt for samples taken and a copy of sample analysis. Duplicate samples shall similarly be provided upon request if the requesting party agrees to have the samples analyzed and to share the results of the analysis with the department.

The right of entry of a duly authorized state employee or representative shall not be subject to the waiver of any potential tort liability of the facility owner or operator. The right of entry of a duly authorized state or health district employee shall not be subject to any confidentiality requirements other than those specified in section 39-4411(3), Idaho Code, and chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code. The right of entry of a private contractor working in a representative capacity for the department may, however, be made subject to additional confidentiality requirements so long as those requirements do not interfere unreasonably with the development of information by the department or the transmission of information from the contractor to the department or the United States environmental protection agency.

Any magistrate or district court judge is authorized to issue an administrative search warrant upon a request from the director describing reasonable cause for issuance of the warrant or the existence of a reasonable program of inspection.

Whenever the director determines that any person is in violation of any provision of this chapter or any permit, standard, regulation, condition, requirement, compliance agreement or order issued or promulgated pursuant to this chapter, one or more of the following actions may be taken:

§ 39-4413. Enforcement procedures.

ADMINISTRATIVE ENFORCEMENT ACTIONS.

Notice. The director may commence an administrative enforcement action by issuing a written notice of violation. The notice of violation shall identify the alleged violation with specificity, shall specify each provision of the act, rule, regulation, permit or order which has been violated, and shall state the amount of civil penalty claimed for each violation. The notice of violation shall inform the person to whom it is directed of an opportunity to confer with the director or the director’s designee in a compliance conference concerning the alleged violation. A written response may be required within fifteen (15) days of receipt of the notice of violation by the person to whom it is directed.

Scheduling Compliance Conference. If a recipient of a notice of violation contacts the department within fifteen (15) days of the receipt of notice, the recipient shall be entitled to a compliance conference. The conference shall be held within twenty (20) days of the date of receipt of notice, unless a later date is agreed upon between the parties. If a compliance conference is not requested, the director may proceed with a civil enforcement action as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

Compliance Conference. The compliance conference shall provide an opportunity for the recipient of a notice of violation to explain the circumstances of the alleged violation and, where appropriate, to present a proposal for remedying damage caused by the alleged violation and for assuring future compliance. If the recipient and the director agree on a plan to remedy damage caused by the alleged violation and to assure future compliance, they may enter into a consent order formalizing their agreement. The consent order may include a provision for payment of any agreed civil penalty.

Effect of Consent Order. A consent order shall be effective immediately upon signing by both parties and shall preclude any civil enforcement action for the same alleged violation. If a party does not comply with the terms of the consent order, the director may seek and obtain in any appropriate district court specific performance of the consent order and such other relief as authorized in this chapter.

Failure to Reach Agreement on Consent Order. If the parties cannot reach agreement on a consent order within sixty (60) days after the receipt of the notice of violation, or if the recipient does not request a compliance conference pursuant to subsection (A)(1)(b) of this section, the director may commence and prosecute a civil enforcement action in district court, in accordance with subsection (A)(3) of this section.

PERMIT SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION PROCEEDINGS.

Grounds. The director may revoke or temporarily suspend the permit of any hazardous waste facility or site pursuant to the grounds provided in subsection (6) of section 39-4409, Idaho Code.

Upon a timely request by a permit holder for a hearing to review the director’s action under subsection (A)(2)(b) of this section, the director shall promptly conduct a hearing open to the public. The contested case provisions of the Idaho administrative procedure act shall apply to all hearings conducted under this subsection.

The director shall have the authority to request from the district court in and for Ada county or any other appropriate district court the issuance of an order in the nature of a subpoena compelling the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production before the director of papers, books, drawings, documents, test results, and other evidence relevant to a permit suspension or revocation investigation or adjudication.

After the hearing, the director shall issue a written opinion setting forth findings of fact, conclusions of law and an order. An aggrieved person subject to the director’s order may seek its review as a final order in a district court as provided by the Idaho administrative procedure act. District court review of the director’s decision shall be limited to the record developed before the director.

CIVIL ENFORCEMENT ACTION. The attorney general may commence and prosecute in district court a civil enforcement action. Civil enforcement actions shall be commenced and prosecuted in the district court in and for the county in which the alleged violation occurred, and may be brought against any person who is alleged to have violated any provision of this chapter or any rule, regulation, permit, condition, requirement, consent order, or order which has become effective pursuant to this chapter. Such action may be brought to compel compliance with any provision of this chapter or with any rule, regulation, permit or order promulgated hereunder, and for any relief or remedies authorized in this chapter. The director shall not be required to initiate or prosecute an administrative action before the attorney general may commence and prosecute a civil enforcement action. In addition, the attorney general may delegate this authority regarding civil enforcement actions to the prosecuting attorney of the county where a civil enforcement action may arise.

A violation that is shown to have occurred as the result of an unforeseeable act of God despite a permitted party’s reasonable efforts to comply with all applicable legal requirements shall not be grounds for a suspension or revocation.
(b) Notice of Hearing. The director shall commence a permit suspension or revocation action by giving a permitted party a written notice of intent to suspend or revoke. The notice shall inform the permitted party of facts or conduct which warrant suspension or revocation of the permit. The notice, hearing, and record requirements for contested cases contained in the Idaho administrative procedure act, chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, and subsection (A)(2)(c) of this section shall apply to proceedings initiated under this subsection. Revocation or suspension of a permit shall become final fifteen (15) days after delivery of the notice of intent to revoke or suspend unless the permitted party requests a hearing.

(c) Administrative Hearing Provisions.

(B) ACTIONS AGAINST GUARANTORS. If the owner or operator is in bankruptcy, reorganization or other arrangement pursuant to the federal bankruptcy code, or where jurisdiction cannot be obtained over an owner or operator likely to be solvent at the time of judgment, an action may be brought directly against a guarantor of financial responsibility by the state or any injured party for any claim arising from conduct for which guarantees of financial responsibility have been made. The guarantor may invoke all rights and defenses which would have been available to the owner or operator and all rights and defenses normally available to the guarantor.